Rhode Island, session 2025, SB230.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-2-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-2 entitled "School
Committees and Superintendents [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education
Act]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-2-17. Right to a safe school.
(a) Each student, staff member, teacher, and administrator has a right to attend and/or work
at a school which is safe and secure, and which is conducive to learning, and which is free from the
threat, actual or implied, of physical harm by a disruptive student. A disruptive student is a person
who is subject to compulsory school attendance, who exhibits persistent conduct which
substantially impedes the ability of other students to learn, or otherwise substantially interferes with
the rights stated above, and who has failed to respond to corrective and rehabilitative measures,
including restorative justice practices, presented by staff, teachers, or administrators.
(b) The school committee, or a school principal as designated by the school committee,
may suspend all pupils in grades six (6) and above found guilty of this conduct, or of violation of
those school regulations which relate to the rights set forth in subsection (a), or where a student
represents a threat to those rights of students, teachers, or administrators, as described in subsection
(a). Nothing in this section shall relieve the school committee or school principals from following
all procedures required by state and federal law regarding discipline of students with disabilities.
(c) The school committee, or a school principal as designated by the school committee,
may issue an out-of-school suspension on a student enrolled in grades preschool through fifth grade

only if the school administration, in consultation with a school psychologist or other mental health
professional, determines that such student’s behavior presents a threat to the physical safety or
health of others which cannot be reduced or eliminated through interventions and supports. In all
such instances, a school shall use appropriate behavioral supports, including, but not limited to,
restorative justice practices, to address a student’s conduct.
(d) An out-of-school suspension for violating school regulations involving alcohol, illegal
drugs or controlled substances, or weapons, shall only be imposed on a case-by-case basis, in
accordance with § 16-21-21.1.
(e) A student suspended under this section may appeal the action of the school committee,
or a school principal as designee, to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education who,
after notice to the parties interested of the time and place of hearing, shall examine and decide the
appeal without cost to the parties involved. Any decision of the commissioner in these matters shall
be subject to appeal by the student to the council on elementary and secondary education and any
decision of the council may be appealed by the student to the family court for the county in which
the school is located as provided in § 42-35-15.
(d)(f) All school superintendents, or their designees, shall review annually, the discipline
data for their school district, collected in accordance with the specifications set forth in § 16-60-
4(a)(21), to determine whether the discipline imposed has a disproportionate impact on students
based on race, ethnicity, or disability status and to appropriately respond to any such disparity. In
addition to the data submitted, if a disparity exists, the every school district shall, after consultation
with representatives of the faculty, submit a an annual report to the council on elementary and
secondary education describing the conduct of the student, the frequency of the conduct, prior
disciplinary actions for the conduct, any other relevant information and corrective actions what
action, if any, has been or is being taken to address the any such disparity, after consultation with
representatives of the faculty has been taken to address the disparity. If a review of the data
determines that there are no such disparities, the district shall submit an annual report to that effect.
The reports shall be deemed to be public records for purposes of title 38.
(e)(g) On or before September 1, 2023, and annually by September 1 thereafter, the Rhode
Island department of education, in coordination with the Rhode Island office of the attorney
general, shall, for each school district, annually collect, report, and publish on its website, data on:
the number of school resource officers; the use of force against students, including, but not limited
to, the number of instances force was used and the type of the force used; arrests of students and
reasons for arrest; student referrals to law enforcement and reasons for referral; student referrals to
court or court service units; and the number and type of any other disciplinary actions taken or
LC000647 - Page 2 of 4

recommended by school resource officers involving students. All data shall be published in a
manner that protects the identities of students and shall be collected and designated by student age,
grade, race, ethnicity, gender, language status, and disability, to the extent that the demographic
data is available.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000647
========
LC000647 - Page 3 of 4